California statutes. Labor Code
(5) This subdivision does not preclude a city, county, city and county, including charter cities, charter counties, and charter cities and counties, from establishing or enforcing a minimum wage applicable to covered health care facility employees, as defined in this section, after January 1, 2034. Any such ordinance, regulation, or administrative action shall be evaluated under ordinary preemption principles.

(6) This subdivision does not preclude a city, county, city and county, including charter cities, charter counties, and charter cities and counties,
 from enacting an ordinance or regulation, or taking administrative action, limiting or otherwise relating to compensation for covered health care facility employees, as defined in this section, after January 1, 2030. Any such ordinance, regulation, or administrative action shall be evaluated under ordinary preemption principles.

(7) This subdivision shall take effect only if subdivision (c) takes effect.

(i) This section shall only take effect when a patient care minimum spending requirement applicable to skilled nursing facilities, as covered in this section, is in effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 28.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1182.16.

Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 1182.14 and subdivision (c) of Section 1182.15, the effective dates of the minimum wage increases required by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), and subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 1182.14 and paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 1182.15 shall be delayed until either subdivision (a) or (b) occur:

(a) (1) If, on or before October 15, 2024, the Director of Finance notifies the Joint Legislative Budget Committee that the Department of Finance has determined that agency cash receipts for the period from July 1, 2024, through
 September 30, 2024, are at least 3 percent higher than the agency cash receipts projected at the time the 2024 Budget Act was enacted for the July 1, 2024, through September 30, 2024 period, based on current law as of the 2024 Budget Act, the minimum wage increases set forth in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), and subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 1182.14 and paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 1182.15 shall be effective October 15, 2024.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “agency cash receipts” means the total amount of the following:

(A) Amounts received under Parts 10, 10.2, and 11 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, that are reported by the Franchise Tax Board to the Department of
 Finance as total net collections, excluding elective tax payments pursuant to Part 10.4 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, pursuant to law, regulation, procedure, and practice (commonly referred to as the “102 Report”) in effect on the effective date of the act establishing this section.

(B) Sales and use tax net cash receipts, as reported by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(b) If the State Department of Health Care Services notifies the Joint Legislative Budget Committee that it has initiated the data retrieval required in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 14169.59 of the Welfare and Institutions Code necessary to implement an increase to hospital quality assurance fee revenues for the program period beginning on January 1, 2025, in accordance with Article 5.230 (commencing with Section 14169.50) of Chapter 7 of Part 3 of Division 9
 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, which would fund increases to supplemental Medi-Cal program payments to hospitals that will provide significant new revenues to hospitals and could support hospitals in complying with, and partially mitigate Medi-Cal program costs of, Sections 1182.14 and 1182.15, the minimum wage increases set forth in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), and subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 1182.14 and paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 1182.15 shall be effective the earlier of January 1, 2025, or 15 days after the date of the State Department of Health Care Service’s notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 29.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1183.

(a) So far as practicable, the commission, by mail, shall send a copy of the order authorized by Section 1182 to each employer in the occupation or industry in question, and each employer shall post a copy of the order in the building in which employees affected by the order are employed. The commission shall also send a copy of the order to each employer registering his or her name with the commission for that purpose, but failure to mail the order or notice of the order to any employer affected by the order shall not relieve the employer from the duty of complying with the order.

(b) The commission shall prepare a summary of the regulations contained in its orders. The summary shall be printed on the first page of the document containing the full text of the order. The summary shall include a brief description of the following subjects of the orders: minimum wage, hours and days of work, reporting time, pay records, cash shortages and breakage, uniforms and equipment, meals and lodging, meal and rest periods, and seats. The summary shall also include information as to how to contact the field office of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement, how to obtain a copy of the full text of the order and the statement as to the basis for the order, and any other information the commission deems necessary. The commission, at its discretion, may prepare a separate summary for each order or any combination of orders, or it may incorporate the regulations of all its orders into a single summary.

(c) A finding by the commission that there has been publication of any action taken by the commission as required by Section 1182.1 is conclusive as to the obligation of an employer to comply with the order.

(d) Every employer who is subject to an order of the commission shall post a copy of the order and keep it posted in a conspicuous location frequented by employees during the hours of the workday.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 150, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1184.

Any action taken by the commission pursuant to Section 1182 shall be effective on the first day of the succeeding January or July and not less than 60 days from the date of publication pursuant to Section 1182.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 150, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1185.

The orders of the commission fixing minimum wages, maximum hours, and standard conditions of labor for all employees, when promulgated in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, shall be valid and operative and such orders are hereby expressly exempted from the provisions of Article 5 (commencing with Section 11346) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676.)
-------------------------------------------

1186.

A person employed in the practice of pharmacy is not exempt from coverage under any provision of the orders of the Industrial Welfare Commission unless he or she individually meets the criteria established for exemption as executive or administrative employees. No person employed in the practice of pharmacy may be subject to any exemption from coverage under the orders of the Industrial Welfare Commission established for professional employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 190, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1186.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, pharmacists engaged in the practice of pharmacy who are employed in the mercantile industry, as defined by Wage Order 7 of the Industrial Welfare Commission, shall be permitted to adopt alternative workweek schedules allowed by the provisions of Wage Order 4, including the provisions for alternative workweeks that can be adopted by employees working in the health care industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 480, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1187.

The findings of fact made by the commission are, in the absence of fraud, conclusive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1188.

Any person aggrieved directly or indirectly by any final rule or regulation of the commission made under this chapter may apply to the commission for a rehearing in respect to any matters determined or covered therein and specified in the application for rehearing within twenty days after the publication thereof. The application for rehearing shall be verified and shall state fully the grounds upon which the application for rehearing is based. The commission upon considering an application for rehearing may grant the same by order and notice thereof given by mail to the party applying for the rehearing, and fix a time for the rehearing and reconsider its order, rule, or regulation. The commission may redetermine the matter upon the record before it and give notice of its redetermination in the same manner as provided for service of an original order, rule, or regulation. The commission may deny such rehearing upon the record before it, giving notice of its decision by mail to the applicant therefor. Such rehearing is deemed to be denied unless acted upon by the commission within thirty days after being filed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1190.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a review or other action permitted by the Constitution and laws of this State by a court of competent jurisdiction with reference to any order, rule, or regulation of the commission under this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1191.

(a) For any occupation in which a minimum wage has been established, the commission may issue to an employee who is mentally or physically disabled, or both, a special license authorizing the employment of the licensee for a period not to exceed one year from date of issue, at a wage less than the legal minimum wage. The commission shall fix a special minimum wage for the licensee. That license may be renewed on a yearly basis. No new licenses may be issued after January 1, 2022. Upon release of the plan, as described in subdivision (c), a license may only be renewed for existing licenseholders who meet the requisite
 benchmarks in the development plan established in accordance with subdivisions (c) and (d). This subdivision shall remain operative only until January 1, 2025, or until the plan as described in subdivision (c) is released, whichever is later, and as of that date is inoperative.

(b) Commencing January 1, 2025, or when the plan as described in subdivision (c) is released, whichever is later, an employee with a disability shall not be paid less than the legal minimum
 wage required by Section 1182.12 or the applicable local minimum wage ordinance, whichever is higher.

(c) The State Council on Developmental Disabilities, in consultation with stakeholders and relevant state agencies, as appropriate, including, but not limited to, the Department of Finance, the Labor and Workforce Development Agency, the Department of Rehabilitation, the State Department of Education, and the State Department of Developmental Services, shall develop a multiyear phaseout plan with stakeholder involvement, by January 1, 2023, in accordance with the procedures set forth in subdivision (d), to pay any employee with a disability, by January 1, 2025, no less than the minimum wage otherwise required for
 an employee under Section 1182.12 or the applicable local minimum wage ordinance, whichever is higher.

(d) The multiyear phaseout plan, as described in subdivision (c) shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Benchmarks and desired outcomes for each year of the plan.

(2) A list of the resources necessary to ensure that employees with disabilities can receive services and support according to their needs and preferences of the individuals and in an integrated setting, regardless of the nature or severity of each individual’s disabilities,
 including an assessment of the financial investment needed to transition individuals to competitive integrated employment or other services, the development of new rates for new service models or additional rates necessary for competitive integrated employment supports, and suggestions for revenue streams.

(3) A road map for applying to and using all federal funding programs, including, but not limited to, programs available under Medicaid waiver amendments, technical assistance grants under the Office of Disability Employment Policy, and resources under the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, to assist individuals with disabilities to obtain competitive, integrated employment.

(4) Data collection and reporting requirements for tracking the following outcomes
 for the individual employees with disabilities who are transitioned out of subminimum wage employment:

(A) Wages earned. 

(B) Hours worked each month.

(C) Type of job.

(D) Length of employment.

(E) Services utilized to obtain competitive integrated employment.

(5) Data collection and reporting requirements that will track the following aggregate outcomes of employees with disabilities who transition out of subminimum wage employment:

(A) Total number of individuals with
 disabilities who are employed and paid subminimum wage.

(B) Employment rates.

(C) The number of individuals who were participating in a subminimum wage position that are not participating in job search activities.

(D) The number of individuals who move from subminimum wage positions to nonpaying activities.

(E) The number of individuals who move from subminimum wage positions to positions that are paid at or above minimum wage. 

(e) In developing
 the multiyear phaseout plan pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d), the State Council on Developmental Disabilities shall engage with and seek input from people with developmental disabilities who have experience working for subminimum wage and stakeholder organizations, including, but not limited to, the protection and advocacy agency designated by the Governor in this state to fulfill the requirements and assurances of the federal Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000, other self-advocate and family organizations, provider organizations, including representatives of organizations utilizing the special minimum wage license and those who previously utilized special minimum wage licenses and have successfully transitioned to other employment models, employer and
 business organizations, and vocational training programs representing those impacted by the changes made to wages for individuals with disabilities.

(f) (1) By January 1, 2023, the State Council on Developmental Disabilities shall release and publicly post a report detailing its multiyear phaseout plan as described in subdivision (c) on its internet website. The State Council on Developmental Disabilities shall also submit a copy of the report on its multiyear phaseout plan to the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature for review on or before January 1, 2023. The report shall include, but
 not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Planned benchmarks developed to achieve the outcomes of the plan.

(B) Recommendations for funding levels or other resources necessary to implement the plan.

(C) Outreach and follow up for each employee with a disability who is being paid less than the minimum wage to ensure that the employee’s wages are brought up to the minimum wage. This outreach and followup may include consultation with members of the employee’s hiring or service coordination team, as appropriate.

(2) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under paragraph (1) is inoperative on January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the
 Government Code.

(3) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(g) (1) The State Council on Developmental Disabilities shall publicly post on its internet website and submit to the Legislature an annual report beginning on January 1, 2024, and continuing for each year of the multiyear phaseout plan, detailing at least, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Status updates on the progress made to meet the developed benchmarks.

(B) Recommendations for funding levels or other resources necessary to implement the plan and an accounting of the
 resources
 invested in the multiyear phaseout plan to date.

(C) The data collected in accordance with paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (d).

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(h) For purposes of this section, “employee with a disability” means an employee who has a “physical disability” or “mental disability” as defined in Section 12926 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 339, Sec. 2.   (SB 639)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1192.

For any occupation in which a minimum wage has been established, the commission may issue to an apprentice or learner a special license authorizing the employment of such apprentice or learner for the time and under the conditions which the commission determines and at a wage less than the legal minimum wage. The commission shall fix a special wage for such apprentice or learner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1193.

The commission may fix the maximum number of employees to be employed under the licenses provided for in Sections 1191 and 1192 in any occupation, trade, industry, or establishment in which a minimum wage has been established.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1122.)
-------------------------------------------

1193.5.

The provisions of this chapter shall be administered and enforced by the division. Any authorized representative of the division shall have authority to:

(a) Investigate and ascertain the wages of all employees, and the hours and working conditions of all employees employed in any occupation in the state;

(b) Supervise the payment of unpaid minimum wages or unpaid overtime compensation owing to any employee under the provisions of this chapter or the orders of the commission. Acceptance of payment of sums found to be due on demand of the division shall constitute a waiver on the part of the employee of his or her cause of action under Section 1194.

Unpaid minimum wages or unpaid overtime wages recovered by the division under the provisions of this section which for any reason cannot be delivered within six months from date of collection to the employee for whom such wages were collected shall be deposited into the Industrial Relations Unpaid Wage Fund in the State Treasury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1083.)
-------------------------------------------

1193.6.

(a) The department or division may, with or without the consent of the employee or employees affected, commence and prosecute a civil action to recover unpaid minimum wages or unpaid overtime compensation, including interest thereon, owing to any employee under this chapter or the orders of the commission, and, in addition to these wages, compensation, and interest, shall be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees, and costs of suit. The consent of any employee to the bringing of this action shall constitute a waiver on the part of the employee of his or her cause of action under Section 1194 unless the action is dismissed without prejudice by the department or the division.

(b) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 825 of the Statutes of 1991 shall apply only to civil actions commenced on or after January 1, 1992.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 427, Sec. 119.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1194.

(a) Notwithstanding any agreement to work for a lesser wage, any employee receiving less than the legal minimum wage or the legal overtime compensation applicable to the employee is entitled to recover in a civil action the unpaid balance of the full amount of this minimum wage or overtime compensation, including interest thereon, reasonable attorney’s fees, and costs of suit.

(b) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 825 of the Statutes of 1991 shall apply only to civil actions commenced on or after January 1, 1992.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 427, Sec. 120.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1194.2.

(a) In any action under Section 98, 1193.6, 1194, or 1197.1 to recover wages because of the payment of a wage less than the minimum wage fixed by an order of the commission or by statute, an employee shall be entitled to recover liquidated damages in an amount equal to the wages unlawfully unpaid and interest thereon. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to authorize the recovery of liquidated damages for failure to pay overtime compensation. A suit may be filed for liquidated damages at any time before the expiration of the statute of limitations on an action for wages from which the liquidated damages arise.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if
 the employer demonstrates to the satisfaction of the court or the Labor Commissioner that the act or omission giving rise to the action was in good faith and that the employer had reasonable grounds for believing that the act or omission was not a violation of any provision of the Labor Code relating to minimum wage, or an order of the commission, the court or the Labor Commissioner may, as a matter of discretion, refuse to award liquidated damages or award any amount of liquidated damages not exceeding the amount specified in subdivision (a).

(c) This section applies only to civil actions commenced on or after January 1, 1992.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 211, Sec. 1.   (AB 2074)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1194.3.

An employee may recover attorney’s fees and costs incurred to enforce a court judgment for unpaid wages due pursuant to this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 655, Sec. 8.   (AB 469)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1194.5.

In any case in which a person employing an employee has willfully violated any of the laws, regulations, or orders governing the wages, hours of work, or working conditions of such employee, the division may seek, in a court of competent jurisdiction, and the court may grant, an injunction against any further violations of any such laws, regulations, or orders by such person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1122.)
-------------------------------------------

1195.

Any person may register with the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement a complaint that the wage paid to an employee for whom a minimum wage has been fixed by the commission is less than that rate. The division shall investigate the matter and take all proceedings necessary to enforce the payment of a wage not less than the minimum wage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

1195.5.

The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall determine, upon request, whether the wages of employees, which exceed the minimum wages fixed by the commission, have been correctly computed and paid. For this purpose, the division may examine the books, reports, contracts, payrolls and other documents of the employer relative to the employment of employees. The division shall enforce the payment of any sums found, upon examination, to be due and unpaid to the employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1184.)
-------------------------------------------

1197.

The minimum wage for employees fixed by the commission or by any applicable state or local law, is the minimum wage to be paid to employees, and the payment of a lower wage than the minimum so fixed is unlawful. This section does not change the applicability of local minimum wage laws
 to any entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 783, Sec. 2.   (AB 970)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1197.1.

(a) Any employer or other person acting either individually or as an officer, agent, or employee of another person, who pays or causes to be paid to any employee a wage less than the minimum fixed by an applicable state or local law, or by an order of the commission, shall be subject to a civil penalty, restitution of wages, liquidated damages payable to the employee, and any applicable penalties imposed pursuant to Section 203 as follows:

(1) For any initial violation that is intentionally committed, one hundred dollars ($100) for each underpaid employee for each pay period for which the employee is underpaid. This amount shall be in addition to an amount sufficient to recover underpaid wages, liquidated damages pursuant to Section 1194.2, and any applicable
 penalties imposed pursuant to Section 203.

(2) For each subsequent violation for the same specific offense, two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each underpaid employee for each pay period for which the employee is underpaid regardless of whether the initial violation is intentionally committed. This amount shall be in addition to an amount sufficient to recover underpaid wages, liquidated damages pursuant to Section 1194.2, and any applicable penalties imposed pursuant to Section 203.

(3) Wages, liquidated damages, and any applicable penalties imposed pursuant to Section 203, recovered pursuant to this section shall be paid to the affected employee.

(b) If, upon inspection or investigation, the Labor Commissioner determines that a person has paid or caused to be paid a wage less than the minimum under applicable
 law, the Labor Commissioner may issue a citation to the person in violation. In addition, if, upon inspection or investigation, the Labor Commissioner determines that an employer has paid or caused to be paid a wage less than the wage set by contract in excess of the applicable minimum wage, the Labor Commissioner may issue a citation to the employer in violation to recover restitution of those amounts owed. The citation may be served personally, in the same manner as provided for service of a summons as described in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 413.10) of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, by certified mail with return receipt requested, or by registered mail in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 11505 of the Government Code. Each citation shall be in writing and shall describe the nature of the violation, including reference to the statutory provision alleged to have been violated, if contract wages are unpaid, or both. The Labor Commissioner shall promptly take all appropriate
 action, in accordance with this section, to enforce the citation and to recover the civil penalty assessed, wages, liquidated damages, and any applicable penalties imposed pursuant to Section 203 in connection with the citation.

(c) (1) If a person desires to contest a citation or the proposed assessment of a civil penalty, wages, liquidated damages, and any applicable penalties imposed pursuant to Section 203 therefor, the person shall, within 15 business days after service of the citation, notify the office of the Labor Commissioner that appears on the citation of their appeal by a request for an informal hearing. The Labor Commissioner or their deputy or agent shall, within 30 days, hold a hearing at the conclusion of which the citation or proposed assessment of a civil penalty, wages, liquidated damages, and any applicable penalties imposed pursuant to Section 203 shall be affirmed, modified, or dismissed.

(2) The decision of the Labor Commissioner shall consist of a notice of findings, findings, and an order, all of which shall be served on all parties to the hearing within 15 days after the hearing by regular first-class mail at the last known address of the party on file with the Labor Commissioner. Service shall be completed pursuant to Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Any amount found due by the Labor Commissioner as a result of a hearing shall become due and payable 45 days after notice of the findings, written findings, and order have been mailed to the party assessed. A writ of mandate may be taken from this finding to the appropriate superior court. The party shall pay any judgment and costs ultimately rendered by the court against the party for the assessment. The writ shall be taken within 45 days of service of the notice of findings, findings, and order thereon.

(3) As a condition to filing a petition for a writ of mandate, the petitioner seeking the writ shall first post a bond with the Labor Commissioner equal to the total amount of any minimum wages, contract wages, liquidated damages, and overtime compensation that are due and owing as determined pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 558, as specified in the citation being challenged. The bond amount shall not include amounts for penalties. The bond shall be issued by a surety duly authorized to do business in this state, shall be issued in favor of unpaid employees, and shall ensure that the petitioner makes payments as set forth in this paragraph. If a decision is entered which affirms or modifies the amounts for minimum wages, contract wages, liquidated damages, or overtime compensation, the petitioner shall pay the amounts owed for the specified items included in a clerk’s judgment entered under subdivision (f) based on the decision, or pursuant to a court judgment in a writ of mandate
 proceeding under paragraph (2). If the request for a writ is withdrawn or dismissed without entry of judgment, the petitioner shall pay the amounts owed for the specified items pursuant to the citation, or the administrative decision if a pending writ of mandate is dismissed prior to a court decision, unless the parties have executed a settlement agreement for payment of some other amount. In the case of a settlement agreement, the petitioner shall pay the amount they are obligated to pay under the terms of the settlement.

(4) If the employer fails to pay the amount of minimum wages, contract wages, liquidated damages, or overtime compensation owed within 10 days of the entry of judgment, dismissal or withdrawal of writ, or the execution of a settlement agreement, a portion of the undertaking, described in paragraph (3), equal to the amount owed, or the entire undertaking if the amount owed exceeds the undertaking, shall be forfeited to the
 Labor Commissioner for appropriate distribution.

(d) A person to whom a citation has been issued shall, in lieu of contesting a citation pursuant to this section, transmit to the office of the Labor Commissioner designated on the citation the amount specified for the violation within 15 business days after issuance of the citation.

(e) When no petition objecting to a citation or the proposed assessment of a civil penalty, wages, liquidated damages, and any applicable penalties imposed pursuant to Section 203 is filed, a certified copy of the citation or proposed civil penalty, wages, liquidated damages, and any applicable penalties imposed pursuant to Section 203 may be filed by the Labor Commissioner in the office of the clerk of the superior court in any county in which the person assessed has or had a place of business. The clerk, immediately upon the filing, shall enter
 judgment for the state against the person assessed in the amount shown on the citation or proposed assessment of a civil penalty, wages, liquidated damages, and any applicable penalties imposed pursuant to Section 203.

(f) When findings and the order thereon are made affirming or modifying a citation or proposed assessment of a civil penalty, wages, liquidated damages, and any applicable penalties imposed pursuant to Section 203 after hearing, a certified copy of these findings and the order entered thereon may be entered by the Labor Commissioner in the office of the clerk of the superior court in any county in which the person assessed has property or in which the person assessed has or had a place of business. The clerk, immediately upon the filing, shall enter judgment for the state against the person assessed in the amount shown on the certified order.

(g) A judgment entered
 pursuant to this section shall bear the same rate of interest and shall have the same effect as other judgments and be given the same preference allowed by the law on other judgments rendered for claims for taxes. The clerk shall make no charge for the service provided by this section to be performed by them.

(h) In a jurisdiction where a local entity has the legal authority to issue a citation against an employer for a violation of any applicable local minimum wage law, the Labor Commissioner, pursuant to a request from the local entity, may issue a citation against an employer for a violation of any applicable local minimum wage law if the local entity has not cited the employer for the same violation. If the Labor Commissioner issues a citation, the local entity shall not cite the employer for the same violation.

(i) The civil penalties provided for in this section are in
 addition to any other penalty provided by law.

(j) This section does not apply to any order of the commission relating to household occupations.

(k) This section does not change the applicability of local minimum wage laws to any entity.

(l) “Contract wages,” as used in this section, means wages based upon an agreement, in excess of the applicable minimum wage, for regular, nonovertime hours.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 223.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1197.2.

(a) In addition to any other penalty imposed by law, an employer who willfully fails to pay and has the ability to pay a final court judgment or final order issued by the Labor Commissioner for all wages due to an employee who has been discharged or who has quit within 90 days of the date that the judgment was entered or the order became final is guilty of a misdemeanor. For purposes of this section, “final court judgment or final order” means a court judgment or order as to which the time to appeal has expired and there is no appeal pending. If the total amount of wages due is one thousand dollars ($1,000) or less, upon conviction therefor, the employer shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or imprisoned in a county jail for not more than six months, for each
 offense. If the total amount of wages due is more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) upon conviction therefor, the employer shall be fined not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) nor more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or imprisoned in a county jail for not less than six months, nor more than one year, or both the fine and imprisonment, for each offense. If there are multiple failures to pay wages involving more than one employee, the total amount of wages due to all employees shall be aggregated together for purposes of determining the level of fine and the term of imprisonment.

(b) As used in this section, “willfully” has the same meaning as provided in Section 7 of the Penal Code.

(c) Nothing in this section precludes prosecution under any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 867, Sec. 13.   (SB 1144)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1197.5.

(a) An employer shall not pay any of its employees at wage rates less than the rates paid to employees of another sex for substantially similar work, when viewed as a composite of skill, effort, and responsibility, and performed under similar working conditions, except where the employer demonstrates:

(1) The wage differential is based upon one or more of the following factors:

(A) A seniority system.

(B) A merit system.

(C) A system that measures earnings by quantity or quality of production.

(D) A bona fide factor other than sex, such as education, training, or experience. This factor shall apply only if the employer demonstrates that the factor is not based on or derived from a sex-based differential in compensation, is job related with respect to the position in question, and is consistent with a business necessity. For purposes of this subparagraph, “business necessity” means an overriding legitimate business purpose such that the factor relied upon effectively fulfills the business purpose it is supposed to serve. This defense shall not apply if the employee demonstrates that an alternative business practice exists that would serve the same business purpose without producing the wage differential.

(2) Each factor relied upon is applied reasonably.

(3) The one or more factors relied upon account for the entire wage differential.

(4) Prior salary shall not justify any disparity in compensation. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to mean that an employer may not make a compensation decision based on a current employee’s existing salary, so long as any wage differential resulting from that compensation decision is justified by one or more of the factors in this subdivision.

(b) An employer shall not pay any of its employees at wage rates less than the rates paid to employees of another race or ethnicity for substantially similar work, when viewed as a composite of skill, effort, and responsibility, and performed under similar working conditions, except
 where the employer demonstrates:

(1) The wage differential is based upon one or more of the following factors:

(A) A seniority system.

(B) A merit system.

(C) A system that measures earnings by quantity or quality of production.

(D) A bona fide factor other than race or ethnicity, such as education, training, or experience. This factor shall apply only if the employer demonstrates that the factor is not based on or derived from a race- or ethnicity-based differential in compensation, is job related with respect to the position in question, and is consistent with a business necessity.
 For purposes of this subparagraph, “business necessity” means an overriding legitimate business purpose such that the factor relied upon effectively fulfills the business purpose it is supposed to serve. This defense shall not apply if the employee demonstrates that an alternative business practice exists that would serve the same business purpose without producing the wage differential.

(2) Each factor relied upon is applied reasonably.

(3) The one or more factors relied upon account for the entire wage differential.
